Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-512.03
Perpetual care trust fund; trustees; qualifications; appointment; bond.

The trustee or trustees of the perpetual care trust fund shall consist of (1) at least three disinterested persons, who have been residents of the county in which the cemetery is located for a period of at least one year prior to their appointment, or (2) a disinterested trust company organized to do business in and located in the State of Nebraska. The trustees or trustee, as the case may be, shall be selected by the officers of the cemetery association. If individual trustees are selected, they shall give a corporate surety bond in a sum not less than one thousand dollars.

Laws 1953, c. 20, § 3, p. 90;

Laws 1955, c. 18, § 2, p. 92;

Laws 1980, LB 909, § 2.